Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-704
Nebraska National Guard; duties.

The Nebraska National Guard shall provide to its members a list of their rights under sections 55-702 and 55-703 and under the federal Servicemembers Civil Relief Act.

Laws 2018, LB682, § 4.